District of Columbia statutes.
29-1015.07

Consolidation.

(a)

Constituent limited cooperative associations may agree to call a merger a consolidation under this subchapter.

(b)

All provisions governing mergers or using the term merger in this chapter shall apply equally to mergers that the constituent associations choose to call consolidations under subsection (a) of his [sic] section.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1611 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.